ro-RO: Metoda de montare a piesei instrumentului: Spate adeziv; Cu șuruburi; Cu clemă; Prindere prin frecare; Prin lipire; Prindere luthier (necesită fasonare); Prindere prin presare; Cu înșurubare; Fixare prin tensiunea corzii; Altele
de: Befestigungsmethode des Instrumententeils: Selbstklebend; Geschraubt; Geklemmt; Gesteckt; Geklebt; Fachgerechte Anpassung erforderlich; Eingepresst; Aufgeschraubt; Durch Saitenspannung befestigt; Sonstige
lt-LT: Instrumento dalies montavimo metodas: Su lipnia nugarėle; Prisukamas varžtais; Prispaudžiamas; Tvirtinamas trintimi; Priklijuojamas; Meistro pritaikymas (reikia formuoti); Įspaudžiamas; Prisukamas; Tvirtinamas stygų įtempimu; Kita
bg-BG: Метод на монтаж на частта на инструмента: С лепящ гръб; С болтове; Със скоба; Монтаж с триене; За залепване; Монтаж от лютиер (изисква оформяне); Пресова сглобка; С винтове; Монтаж чрез опън на струните; Други
hr-HR: Način montaže dijela instrumenta: S ljepljivom poleđinom; Na vijke; Na stezaljku; Frikcijski spoj; Na lijepljenje; Ugradnja od strane graditelja (zahtijeva oblikovanje); Na pritisak; Na navrtanje; Montaža napetošću žica; Ostalo
sl-SI: Način montaže dela instrumenta: Samolepilno; Pritrditev z vijaki; Pritrditev s sponko; Torno prileganje; Na lepilo; Goslarska vgradnja (potrebno oblikovanje); Vtiskalna; Na vijak; Pritrditev z napetostjo strun; Drugo
tr: Enstrüman parçasının monte edilme yöntemi: Arkası yapışkanlı; Cıvatalı; Kelepçeli; Sürtünmeli geçme; Tutkallı; Luthier montajı (şekillendirme gerektirir); Pres geçme; Vidalı; Tel gerilimi ile monteli; Diğer
ru: Способ крепления детали инструмента: На клеевой основе; На болтах; На зажимах; Фрикционная посадка; На клею; Установка мастером (требует подгонки); Посадка с натягом; На винтах; Удержание за счет натяжения струн; Другое
ko: 악기 부품 장착 방법: 접착식; 볼트온; 클램프온; 마찰 결합식; 접착식; 루시어 맞춤(성형 필요); 압입식; 스크류온; 현 장력 장착형; 기타
pt-BR: Peça de instrumento método de montagem: Verso adesivo; Parafusado; Fixado com braçadeira; Encaixe por fricção; Colado; Encaixe para luthier (requer modelagem); Encaixe sob pressão; Aparafusado; Montado por tensão da corda; Outro
cs: Způsob montáže části nástroje: Samolepicí zadní strana; Šroubovací; Uchycení na svorku; Třecí spoj; Lepicí; Instalace kytarářem (vyžaduje tvarování); Zalisované; Našroubovací; Montáž pnutím strun; Jiné
es: Método de montaje de la pieza del instrumento: Reverso adhesivo; Atornillable; Sujeto con abrazadera; Ajuste por fricción; Pegable; Ajuste de luthier (requiere moldeado); Ajuste a presión; Enroscable; Montaje por tensión de cuerda; Otro
hu: Hangszeralkatrész-rögzítési mód: Öntapadós hátlapú; Rácsavarozható; Rácsíptethető; Súrlódással rögzülő; Ragasztható; Hangszerészi illesztést igényel (alakítás szükséges); Bepréselhető; Rácsavarható; Húrfeszítéssel rögzített; Egyéb
en: Instrument part mounting method: Adhesive-backed; Bolt-on; Clamp-on; Friction-fit; Glue-on; Luthier-fit (requires shaping); Press-fit; Screw-on; String-tension mounted; Other
fi: Soitinosan kiinnitysmenetelmä: Liimataustainen; Pultattava; Puristinkiinnitys; Kitkasovite; Liimattava; Soitinrakentajan sovite (vaatii muotoilua); Puristussovite; Ruuvattava; Kielenjännityskiinnitys; Muu
zh-CN: 仪器部件安装方法: 背胶式; 螺栓固定; 夹具固定; 摩擦配合; 胶粘式; 制琴师匹配（需要塑形）; 压配式; 螺钉固定; 琴弦张力安装; 其他
zh-TW: 樂器零件安裝方式: 背膠; 螺栓固定; 夾鉗固定; 摩擦接合; 黏接式; 琴師安裝 (需塑形); 壓入接合; 旋入固定; 琴弦張力固定; 其他
fr: Mode de montage d’une pièce d’instrument: Dos adhésif; Boulonné; Serrage par collier; Ajustement par friction; Collé; Ajustement luthier (nécessite un façonnage); Inséré à la presse; Vissé; Monté par tension de corde; Autre
sk-SK: Spôsob upevnenia časti nástroja: So samolepiacou zadnou stranou; Skrutkovacie; Upínacie svorkou; Trecí spoj; Nalepovacie; Prispôsobenie husliarom (vyžaduje tvarovanie); Lisovaný spoj; Naskrutkovacie; Upevnené napnutím strún; Iné
nl: Instrument onderdeel montagemethode: Klevende achterkant; Aangebout; Opgeklemd; Klemvast; Gelijmd; Luthier-fit (vereist aanpassing); Perspassing; Opgeschroefd; Gemonteerd met snaarspanning; Overige
pt-PT: método de montagem das peças do instrumento: Com verso adesivo; Aparafusado; Fixação por grampo; Encaixe por fricção; Colado; Encaixe por luthier (requer moldagem); Encaixe sob pressão; Aparafusado; Montado por tensão das cordas; Outro
vi: Phương pháp lắp đặt bộ phận nhạc cụ: Mặt sau có keo dán; Gắn bằng bu-lông; Gắn bằng kẹp; Lắp chặt bằng ma sát; Dán bằng keo; Do thợ chế tác lắp (cần tạo hình); Lắp ép; Gắn bằng vít; Lắp bằng độ căng của dây; Khác
it: Metodo di montaggio della parte dello strumento: Con retro adesivo; Imbullonato; A morsetto; A incastro ad attrito; A colla; Adattamento da liutaio (richiede sagomatura); A pressione; Avvitato; Montato con tensione delle corde; Altro
da: Monteringsmetode for instrumentdel: Selvklæbende bagside; Bolt-on; Fastspændt; Friktionspasning; Påklistret; Tilpasning af instrumentmager (kræver formning); Presspasning; Påskruet; Monteret med strengespænding; Andet
ja: 計器部品の取り付け方法: 粘着裏地; ボルトオン; クランプオン; 摩擦フィット; 接着; ルシアーフィット (成形が必要); プレスフィット; ねじ止め; 弦の張力で固定; その他
nb: Monteringsmetode for instrumentdeler: Selvklebende bakside; Boltes på; Klemmes på; Friksjonspassform; Limes på; Instrumentmakertilpasning (krever forming); Presspassform; Skrus på; Strengspennmontert; Annet
th: วิธีการติดตั้งชิ้นส่วนเครื่องมือ: แผ่นหลังกาว; ขันน็อต; หนีบ; สวมอัด; ติดกาว; พอดีแบบช่างทำเครื่องดนตรี (ต้องใช้การขึ้นรูป); สวมอัด; ขันสกรู; ยึดด้วยความตึงของสาย; อื่นๆ
sv: Monteringsmetod för instrumentdelar: Självhäftande baksida; Bultmontering; Klämmontering; Friktionspassning; Limmontering; Instrumentmakarpassning (kräver formning); Presspassning; Skruvmontering; Montering med strängspänning; Övrigt
pl: Metoda montażu części instrumentu: Z warstwą samoprzylepną; Przykręcany; Zaciskany; Na wcisk (cierny); Wklejany; Dopasowanie lutnicze (wymaga kształtowania); Wciskany; Przykręcany; Utrzymywany przez naciąg strun; Inny
el: Μέθοδος τοποθέτησης εξαρτήματος οργάνου: Με αυτοκόλλητη πλάτη; Με βίδες; Με σφιγκτήρα; Προσαρμογή με τριβή; Με κόλλα; Εφαρμογή από οργανοποιό (απαιτεί διαμόρφωση); Πρεσαριστό; Βιδωτό; Τοποθέτηση με την τάση των χορδών; Άλλο